lexd_components/hye-eanc_nouns.lexd
գոմեշ:գոմեշ
ձյուն:ձյուն{mono}
կաղկանձյուն:կաղկանձյուն{mono}
գայլաբույն:գայլաբույն{mono}
ավազակաբույն:ավազակաբույն{mono}
սարեկաբույն:սարեկաբույն{mono}
օձաբույն:օձաբույն{mono}
ակնաբույն:ակնաբույն{mono}
շնաբույն:շնաբույն{mono}
թռչնաբույն:թռչնաբույն{mono}
մրջնաբույն:մրջնաբույն{mono}
աղավնաբույն:աղավնաբույն{mono}
արջաբույն:արջաբույն{mono}
վանակն:վանակն
եզնակն:եզնակն
հաղարջակն:հաղարջակն
ծովակն:ծովակն
ցայտակն:ցայտակն
գիշերակն:գիշերակն
կարմրակն:կարմրակն
բևեկն:բևեկն
բևեկն:բևեկն
աղձուկն:աղձուկն
որմզդեղն:որմզդեղն{mono}
ուլն:ուլն
կարկին:կարկին
կապալատու:կապալատու
արյունատու:արյունատու
կաշառատու:կաշառատու
ժողովածու:ժողովածու
ֆեոդ:ֆեոդ
զոդ:զոդ{mono}
ակնազոդ:ակնազոդ{mono}
մեթոդ:մեթոդ
կոդ:կոդ
ունդ:ունդ
դուրգ:դուրգ
ունգ:ունգ
ռունգ:ռունգ
քունգ:քունգ
բոգ:բոգ
գոգ:գոգ
հոգ:հոգ
մոգ:մոգ
շոգ:շոգ
թարգ:թարգ
կարգ:կարգ
հարգ:հարգ
մարգ:մարգ
վարգ:վարգ
երգ:երգ
վիրգ:վիրգ
գորգ:գորգ
բուրգ:բուրգ
բադ:բադ
ռադ:ռադ
ազդ:ազդ
խինդ:խինդ
կոնդ:կոնդ
կոնդ:կոնդ
պոնդ:պոնդ
ֆոնդ:ֆոնդ
հոդ:հոդ
ծնկահոդ:ծնկահոդ
արմնկահոդ:արմնկահոդ
մատնահոդ:մատնահոդ
կիսահոդ:կիսահոդ
ուսահոդ:ուսահոդ
անդ:անդ
բանդ:բանդ
խանդ:խանդ
կանդ:կանդ
հանդ:հանդ
սանդ:սանդ
տենդ:տենդ
կունդ:կունդ
պատուհանագոգ:պատուհանագոգ{mono}
սինագոգ:սինագոգ{mono}
լեռնագոգ:լեռնագոգ{mono}
նավագոգ:նավագոգ{mono}
ծովագոգ:ծովագոգ{mono}
լուսամուտագոգ:լուսամուտագոգ{mono}
սարագոգ:սարագոգ{mono}
ենթակարգ:ենթակարգ{mono}
վարվելակարգ:վարվելակարգ{mono}
գլխակարգ:գլխակարգ{mono}
կենցաղակարգ:կենցաղակարգ{mono}
արարողակարգ:արարողակարգ{mono}
համակարգ:համակարգ{mono}
ռազմակարգ:ռազմակարգ{mono}
աստիճանակարգ:աստիճանակարգ{mono}
օրինակարգ:օրինակարգ{mono}
համայնակարգ:համայնակարգ{mono}
կանոնակարգ:կանոնակարգ{mono}
սյունակարգ:սյունակարգ{mono}
վարչակարգ:վարչակարգ{mono}
առաջակարգ:առաջակարգ{mono}
բառակարգ:բառակարգ{mono}
դասակարգ:դասակարգ{mono}
տնտեսակարգ:տնտեսակարգ{mono}
հանդիսակարգ:հանդիսակարգ{mono}
ծիսակարգ:ծիսակարգ{mono}
իրավակարգ:իրավակարգ{mono}
թվակարգ:թվակարգ{mono}
ավատակարգ:ավատակարգ{mono}
մարտակարգ:մարտակարգ{mono}
շարակարգ:շարակարգ{mono}
հասարակարգ:հասարակարգ{mono}
վերակարգ:վերակարգ{mono}
իրակարգ:իրակարգ{mono}
հանրակարգ:հանրակարգ{mono}
ընտրակարգ:ընտրակարգ{mono}
օրակարգ:օրակարգ{mono}
հայեցակարգ:հայեցակարգ{mono}
սարքուկարգ:սարքուկարգ{mono}
սիզամարգ:սիզամարգ{mono}
ծաղկամարգ:ծաղկամարգ{mono}
արոտամարգ:արոտամարգ{mono}
սիրամարգ:սիրամարգ{mono}
լորամարգ:լորամարգ{mono}
մանրավարգ:մանրավարգ{mono}
ողբերգ:ողբերգ{mono}
խմբերգ:խմբերգ{mono}
այգերգ:այգերգ{mono}
ցայգերգ:ցայգերգ{mono}
հանգերգ:հանգերգ{mono}
սրնգերգ:սրնգերգ{mono}
սգերգ:սգերգ{mono}
զուգերգ:զուգերգ{mono}
հաղթերգ:հաղթերգ{mono}
քայլերգ:քայլերգ{mono}
նախերգ:նախերգ{mono}
կատակերգ:կատակերգ{mono}
մահերգ:մահերգ{mono}
խաղերգ:խաղերգ{mono}
տաղերգ:տաղերգ{mono}
եղերգ:եղերգ{mono}
ռազմերգ:ռազմերգ{mono}
գութաներգ:գութաներգ{mono}
գուսաներգ:գուսաներգ{mono}
մեներգ:մեներգ{mono}
դյուցազներգ:դյուցազներգ{mono}
կրկներգ:կրկներգ{mono}
օրհներգ:օրհներգ{mono}
հալավօրհներգ:հալավօրհներգ{mono}
դաշներգ:դաշներգ{mono}
ձոներգ:ձոներգ{mono}
հարսներգ:հարսներգ{mono}
քներգ:քներգ{mono}
վիպերգ:վիպերգ{mono}
վերջերգ:վերջերգ{mono}
ասերգ:ասերգ{mono}
գովերգ:գովերգ{mono}
հովվերգ:հովվերգ{mono}
թատերգ:թատերգ{mono}
քնարերգ:քնարերգ{mono}
պարերգ:պարերգ{mono}
դերերգ:դերերգ{mono}
եղերերգ:եղերերգ{mono}
գիշերերգ:գիշերերգ{mono}
սիրերգ:սիրերգ{mono}
ծաղրերգ:ծաղրերգ{mono}
օրրերգ:օրրերգ{mono}
մետաքսագորգ:մետաքսագորգ{mono}
ուղեգորգ:ուղեգորգ{mono}
շիրմաբուրգ:շիրմաբուրգ{mono}
սուզաբադ:սուզաբադ{mono}
վահանաբադ:վահանաբադ{mono}
ահազդ:ահազդ{mono}
մահազդ:մահազդ{mono}
գովազդ:գովազդ{mono}
գոմահանդ:գոմահանդ{mono}
սանդղհանդ:սանդղհանդ{mono}
աղասանդ:աղասանդ{mono}
սարավանդ:սարավանդ{mono}
ծննդատենդ:ծննդատենդ{mono}
հարբուխատենդ:հարբուխատենդ{mono}
դարձատենդ:դարձատենդ{mono}
ճահճատենդ:ճահճատենդ{mono}
դեղնատենդ:դեղնատենդ{mono}
եղնջատենդ:եղնջատենդ{mono}
ժանտատենդ:ժանտատենդ{mono}
արբեցատենդ:արբեցատենդ{mono}
ռադիոզոնդ:ռադիոզոնդ{mono}
հողաֆոնդ:հողաֆոնդ{mono}
դրամաֆոնդ:դրամաֆոնդ{mono}
գրաֆոնդ:գրաֆոնդ{mono}
բնակֆոնդ:բնակֆոնդ{mono}
վերածնունդ:վերածնունդ{mono}
միտինգ:միտինգ
տռտինգ:տռտինգ
հարինգ:հարինգ
մոնիտորինգ:մոնիտորինգ
ծլոնգ:ծլոնգ
ծլինգ-ծլոնգ:ծլինգ-ծլոնգ
լոզունգ:լոզունգ
ժանգուժունգ:ժանգուժունգ
ծլունգ:ծլունգ
ծլունգ-ծլունգ:ծլունգ-ծլունգ
քլունգ:քլունգ
հանգուհունգ:հանգուհունգ
եղունգ:եղունգ
սպունգ:սպունգ
վարունգ:վարունգ
մագոգ:մագոգ
դեմագոգ:դեմագոգ
իդեոլոգ:իդեոլոգ
ֆիզիոլոգ:ֆիզիոլոգ
սոցիոլոգ:սոցիոլոգ
ֆիլոլոգ:ֆիլոլոգ
տեխնոլոգ:տեխնոլոգ
դրոգ:դրոգ
համերգ:համերգ
մենահամերգ:մենահամերգ
դրամատուրգ:դրամատուրգ
կինոդրամատուրգ:կինոդրամատուրգ
օկրուգ:օկրուգ
բրիգադ:բրիգադ
սևադ:սևադ
բալլադ:բալլադ
բարիկադ:բարիկադ
կասկադ:կասկադ
ռաֆինադ:ռաֆինադ
ֆասադ:ֆասադ
շվեդ:շվեդ
բնազդ:բնազդ
ավարտազդ:ավարտազդ
եզիդ:եզիդ
քղամիդ:քղամիդ
մեչիդ:մեչիդ
ապսիդ:ապսիդ
օքսիդ:օքսիդ
ենթաօքսիդ:ենթաօքսիդ
մետաղօքսիդ:մետաղօքսիդ
գերօքսիդ:գերօքսիդ
ջրօքսիդ:ջրօքսիդ
հիբրիդ:հիբրիդ
ջիրիդ:ջիրիդ
ծղրիդ:ծղրիդ
խլրդածղրիդ:խլրդածղրիդ
խալդ:խալդ
աքլորախեղդ:աքլորախեղդ
գելխեղդ:գելխեղդ
գայլխեղդ:գայլխեղդ
ջրբանդ:ջրբանդ
պրոպագանդ:պրոպագանդ
արգանդ:արգանդ
կալանդ:կալանդ
ոտնակալանդ:ոտնակալանդ
բլանդ:բլանդ
աղանդ:աղանդ
կաղանդ:կաղանդ
տաղանդ:տաղանդ
ադամանդ:ադամանդ
ֆլամանդ:ֆլամանդ
ճարմանդ:ճարմանդ
սպանդ:սպանդ
կոսպանդ:կոսպանդ
եռանդ:եռանդ
հրասանդ:հրասանդ
վարսանդ:վարսանդ
ավանդ:ավանդ
գահավանդ:գահավանդ
դարավանդ:դարավանդ
պարավանդ:պարավանդ
վարավանդ:վարավանդ
գովանդ:գովանդ
պատանդ:պատանդ
լեգենդ:լեգենդ
թինդ:թինդ
հռինդ:հռինդ
շռինդ:շռինդ
ափսինդ:ափսինդ
դրինդ:դրինդ
վունդերքինդ:վունդերքինդ
ռաունդ:ռաունդ
անդունդ:անդունդ
ելունդ:ելունդ
չարելունդ:չարելունդ
դոդ:դոդ
ծագ:ծագ
ռումբ:ռումբ
այբ:այբ
զարբ:զարբ
քարբ:քարբ
գերբ:գերբ
սերբ:սերբ
որբ:որբ
թագ:թագ
ձագ:ձագ
սագ:սագ
բեգ:բեգ
ծեգ:ծեգ
հեգ:հեգ
մեգ:մեգ
վեգ:վեգ
տեգ:տեգ
ազգ:ազգ
ճիգ:ճիգ
նիգ:նիգ
սիգ:սիգ
վիգ:վիգ
վիգ:վիգ
այգ:այգ
ցայգ:ցայգ
զույգ:զույգ
բանգ:բանգ
գանգ:գանգ
զանգ:զանգ
կանգ:կանգ
հանգ:հանգ
հանգ:հանգ
հանգ:հանգ
ռանգ:ռանգ
դինգ:դինգ
լինգ:լինգ
արաբա:արաբա
մուրաբա:մուրաբա
աբբա:աբբա
ամեոբա:ամեոբա
զոռբա:զոռբա
օբա:օբա
դագա:դագա
ապագա:ապագա
պարագա:պարագա
կոլեգա:կոլեգա
լիգա:լիգա
ֆոլգա:ֆոլգա
տայգա:տայգա
ագուգա:ագուգա
ֆուգա:ֆուգա
բրիգադա:բրիգադա
սպարտակիադա:սպարտակիադա
օլիմպիադա:օլիմպիադա
բլոկադա:բլոկադա
թամադա:թամադա
գյադա:գյադա
էստրադա:էստրադա
բանդա:բանդա
պրոպագանդա:պրոպագանդա
ռանդա:ռանդա
ֆրոնդա:ֆրոնդա
սոդա:սոդա
հորդա:հորդա
քորդա:քորդա
քեդխուդա:քեդխուդա
հուդա:հուդա
գյադա-գյուդա:գյադա-գյուդա
օդա:օդա
ասամբլեա:ասամբլեա
հրեա:հրեա
բազա:բազա
մազա:մազա
պեմզա:պեմզա
ֆանզա:ֆանզա
բրինզա:բրինզա
դոզա:դոզա
պրոզա:պրոզա
մեդուզա:մեդուզա
փիրուզա:փիրուզա
գաթա:գաթա
խաթա:խաթա
ռափաթա:ռափաթա
շղթա:շղթա
խարսխաշղթա:խարսխաշղթա
ղեկաշղթա:ղեկաշղթա
ծաղկաշղթա:ծաղկաշղթա
լեռնաշղթա:լեռնաշղթա
ձեռնաշղթա:ձեռնաշղթա
պարաշղթա:պարաշղթա
ոսկեշղթա:ոսկեշղթա
գողգոթա:գողգոթա
թորթա:թորթա
քուֆթա:քուֆթա
էլեգիա:էլեգիա
կոլեգիա:կոլեգիա
կուսկոլեգիա:կուսկոլեգիա
դեմագոգիա:դեմագոգիա
տրիլոգիա:տրիլոգիա
իդեոլոգիա:իդեոլոգիա
անթոլոգիա:անթոլոգիա
ագրոբիոլոգիա:ագրոբիոլոգիա
ֆիզիոլոգիա:ֆիզիոլոգիա
սոցիոլոգիա:սոցիոլոգիա
ֆիլոլոգիա:ֆիլոլոգիա
տեխնոլոգիա:տեխնոլոգիա
ֆոնոլոգիա:ֆոնոլոգիա
պալեոնտոլոգիա:պալեոնտոլոգիա
լեթարգիա:լեթարգիա
էներգիա:էներգիա
էլեկտրաէներգիա:էլեկտրաէներգիա
մետալուրգիա:մետալուրգիա
դրամատուրգիա:դրամատուրգիա
կինոդրամատուրգիա:կինոդրամատուրգիա
կոմեդիա:կոմեդիա
մելոդիա:մելոդիա
ռապսոդիա:ռապսոդիա
գվարդիա:գվարդիա
ստուդիա:ստուդիա
կինոստուդիա:կինոստուդիա
գիմնազիա:գիմնազիա
բուրժուազիա:բուրժուազիա
գեոդեզիա:գեոդեզիա
մագնեզիա:մագնեզիա
պոեզիա:պոեզիա
դիվիզիա:դիվիզիա
ռեցենզիա:ռեցենզիա
լիցենզիա:լիցենզիա
կորոզիա:կորոզիա
մագնոլիա:մագնոլիա
մոնոպոլիա:մոնոպոլիա
մետրոպոլիա:մետրոպոլիա
անարխիա:անարխիա
բամիա:բամիա
ակադեմիա:ակադեմիա
քիմիա:քիմիա
դատաքիմիա:դատաքիմիա
փայտաքիմիա:փայտաքիմիա
ալքիմիա:ալքիմիա
գեոքիմիա:գեոքիմիա
բիոքիմիա:բիոքիմիա
ռադիոքիմիա:ռադիոքիմիա
ֆոտոքիմիա:ֆոտոքիմիա
ագրոքիմիա:ագրոքիմիա
ֆիզիոնոմիա:ֆիզիոնոմիա
ագրոնոմիա:ագրոնոմիա
անատոմիա:անատոմիա
մահագոնիա:մահագոնիա
հեգեմոնիա:հեգեմոնիա
ֆիլհարմոնիա:ֆիլհարմոնիա
սիմֆոնիա:սիմֆոնիա
ուտոպիա:ուտոպիա
մեսիա:մեսիա
սեսիա:սեսիա
ագրեսիա:ագրեսիա
ռեպրեսիա:ռեպրեսիա
կոնցեսիա:կոնցեսիա
միսիա:միսիա
դիվերսիա:դիվերսիա
էքսկուրսիա:էքսկուրսիա
դիսկուսիա:դիսկուսիա
դիպլոմատիա:դիպլոմատիա
դեմոկրատիա:դեմոկրատիա
սոցիալ-դեմոկրատիա:սոցիալ-դեմոկրատիա
դինաստիա:դինաստիա
պարտիա:պարտիա
կոմպարտիա:կոմպարտիա
մալարիա:մալարիա
դիֆթերիա:դիֆթերիա
սերիա:սերիա
մատերիա:մատերիա
դիզենտերիա:դիզենտերիա
հիստերիա:հիստերիա
կրիա:կրիա
ծովակրիա:ծովակրիա
գետակրիա:գետակրիա
թեորիա:թեորիա
ինֆուզորիա:ինֆուզորիա
կալորիա:կալորիա
սանատորիա:սանատորիա
կոնսերվատորիա:կոնսերվատորիա
լաբորատորիա:լաբորատորիա
ֆոտոլաբորատորիա:ֆոտոլաբորատորիա
օրատորիա:օրատորիա
տերիտորիա:տերիտորիա
վիկտորիա:վիկտորիա
կուրիա:կուրիա
ֆուրիա:ֆուրիա
ինկուբացիա:ինկուբացիա
դելեգացիա:դելեգացիա
ռեալիզացիա:ռեալիզացիա
ռադիացիա:ռադիացիա
ասիմիլիացիա:ասիմիլիացիա
ավիացիա:ավիացիա
ասոցիացիա:ասոցիացիա
ակացիա:ակացիա
ռադիոֆիկացիա:ռադիոֆիկացիա
կինոֆիկացիա:կինոֆիկացիա
ռադիոլոկացիա:ռադիոլոկացիա
պրովոկացիա:պրովոկացիա
ռեկլամացիա:ռեկլամացիա
ֆորմացիա:ֆորմացիա
ինֆորմացիա:ինֆորմացիա
դիսիմիլյացիա:դիսիմիլյացիա
տրանսլյացիա:տրանսլյացիա
ռադիոտրանսլյացիա:ռադիոտրանսլյացիա
կապիտուլյացիա:կապիտուլյացիա
կոորդինացիա:կոորդինացիա
կուլմինացիա:կուլմինացիա
կոմպենսացիա:կոմպենսացիա
սենսացիա:սենսացիա
ֆիքսացիա:ֆիքսացիա
ագիտացիա:ագիտացիա
ռեաբիլիտացիա:ռեաբիլիտացիա
կոնսուլտացիա:կոնսուլտացիա
կոոպտացիա:կոոպտացիա
դիսերտացիա:դիսերտացիա
դեկլարացիա:դեկլարացիա
ռեպարացիա:ռեպարացիա
ինտեգրացիա:ինտեգրացիա
միգրացիա:միգրացիա
ֆեդերացիա:ֆեդերացիա
կոոպերացիա:կոոպերացիա
սպառկոոպերացիա:սպառկոոպերացիա
օպերացիա:օպերացիա
դեկորացիա:դեկորացիա
ադմինիստրացիա:ադմինիստրացիա
էվակուացիա:էվակուացիա
տրապեցիա:տրապեցիա
ինկվիզիցիա:ինկվիզիցիա
կոմպոզիցիա:կոմպոզիցիա
կոալիցիա:կոալիցիա
միլիցիա:միլիցիա
ինտուիցիա:ինտուիցիա
ակցիա:ակցիա
ռեակցիա:ռեակցիա
աբստրակցիա:աբստրակցիա
ֆրակցիա:ֆրակցիա
կոլեկցիա:կոլեկցիա
դիրեկցիա:դիրեկցիա
ֆունկցիա:ֆունկցիա
դեդուկցիա:դեդուկցիա
ինդուկցիա:ինդուկցիա
կոնստրուկցիա:կոնստրուկցիա
ինտելիգենցիա:ինտելիգենցիա
ռեզիդենցիա:ռեզիդենցիա
կոնվենցիա:կոնվենցիա
կոմպետենցիա:կոմպետենցիա
կոռուպցիա:կոռուպցիա
իներցիա:իներցիա
ռեվոլյուցիա:ռեվոլյուցիա
էվոլյուցիա:էվոլյուցիա
կոնստիտուցիա:կոնստիտուցիա
ալելուիա:ալելուիա
պոլիգրաֆիա:պոլիգրաֆիա
պալեոգրաֆիա:պալեոգրաֆիա
կինեմատոգրաֆիա:կինեմատոգրաֆիա
բալա:բալա
խաթաբալա:խաթաբալա
մալա:մալա
սալա:սալա
նովելա:նովելա
նարգիլա:նարգիլա
շիլա:շիլա
շիլա:շիլա
վարսակաշիլա:վարսակաշիլա
չիքիլա:չիքիլա
տարանտելլա:տարանտելլա
գորիլլա:գորիլլա
մոլլա:մոլլա
գյուլլա:գյուլլա
բակլա:բակլա
յայլա:յայլա
ղշլա:ղշլա
հիպերբոլա:հիպերբոլա
օսլա:օսլա
ֆաբուլա:ֆաբուլա
թուլա:թուլա
լուլա:լուլա
սառցալուլա:սառցալուլա
պաղլուլա:պաղլուլա
կուլա:կուլա
ջրակուլա:ջրակուլա
քուլա:քուլա
ծխաքուլա:ծխաքուլա
բամբակաքուլա:բամբակաքուլա
ամպաքուլա:ամպաքուլա
յախա:յախա
խոխա:խոխա
չուխա:չուխա
ընծա:ընծա
նախընծա:նախընծա
ենթակա:ենթակա
ենթակա:ենթակա
հակա:հակա
տապակա:տապակա
մեթոդիկա:մեթոդիկա
ֆիզիկա:ֆիզիկա
աստղաֆիզիկա:աստղաֆիզիկա
գեոֆիզիկա:գեոֆիզիկա
բիոֆիզիկա:բիոֆիզիկա
ռադիոֆիզիկա:ռադիոֆիզիկա
հիդրոֆիզիկա:հիդրոֆիզիկա
էթիկա:էթիկա
ռեսպուբլիկա:ռեսպուբլիկա
ռեպլիկա:ռեպլիկա
աերոդինամիկա:աերոդինամիկա
կերամիկա:կերամիկա
էկոնոմիկա:էկոնոմիկա
մեխանիկա:մեխանիկա
կլինիկա:կլինիկա
պոլիկլինիկա:պոլիկլինիկա
տեխնիկա:տեխնիկա
լուսատեխնիկա:լուսատեխնիկա
ջրատեխնիկա:ջրատեխնիկա
էլեկտրատեխնիկա:էլեկտրատեխնիկա
ռադիոտեխնիկա:ռադիոտեխնիկա
ագրոտեխնիկա:ագրոտեխնիկա
հիդրոտեխնիկա:հիդրոտեխնիկա
տեկտոնիկա:տեկտոնիկա
կինոխրոնիկա:կինոխրոնիկա
մաթեմատիկա:մաթեմատիկա
կինեմատիկա:կինեմատիկա
իդիոմատիկա:իդիոմատիկա
աերոստատիկա:աերոստատիկա
էներգետիկա:էներգետիկա
աթլետիկա:աթլետիկա
կոսմետիկա:կոսմետիկա
գենետիկա:գենետիկա
կինետիկա:կինետիկա
կիբեռնետիկա:կիբեռնետիկա
պոետիկա:պոետիկա
տակտիկա:տակտիկա
պրակտիկա:պրակտիկա
դիալեկտիկա:դիալեկտիկա
էկլեկտիկա:էկլեկտիկա
արկտիկա:արկտիկա
ռոմանտիկա:ռոմանտիկա
էկզոտիկա:էկզոտիկա
օպտիկա:օպտիկա
սխոլաստիկա:սխոլաստիկա
միստիկա:միստիկա
ֆաբրիկա:ֆաբրիկա
կինոֆաբրիկա:կինոֆաբրիկա
հիստերիկա:հիստերիկա
լիրիկա:լիրիկա
սրիկա:սրիկա
գրաֆիկա:գրաֆիկա
ֆալախկա:ֆալախկա
լուսնկա:լուսնկա
հսկա:հսկա
վկա:վկա
նախավկա:նախավկա
մարտավկա:մարտավկա
առարկա:առարկա
շուկա:շուկա
հնոտիաշուկա:հնոտիաշուկա
թռչնաշուկա:թռչնաշուկա
անասնաշուկա:անասնաշուկա
աշխատաշուկա:աշխատաշուկա
բիձա:բիձա
աղա:աղա
աբեղա:աբեղա
շափիղա:շափիղա
ծնծղա:ծնծղա
յորղա:յորղա
շափյուղա:շափյուղա
շուղա:շուղա
պուճպուճա:պուճպուճա
դամա:դամա
լամա:լամա
լամա:լամա
խաշլամա:խաշլամա
տամա:տամա
դրամա:դրամա
պանորամա:պանորամա
մագմա:մագմա
դոգմա:դոգմա
թեմա:թեմա
ենթաթեմա:ենթաթեմա
դիլեմա:դիլեմա
սխեմա:սխեմա
ֆոնեմա:ֆոնեմա
պրոտոպլազմա:պրոտոպլազմա
վազմա:վազմա
ասթմա:ասթմա
չխրթմա:չխրթմա
կլիմա:կլիմա
չալմա:չալմա
տոլմա:տոլմա
դրախմա:դրախմա
հմա:հմա
երազահմա:երազահմա
աստղահմա:աստղահմա
թռչնահմա:թռչնահմա
